Idaho statutes. Title 9 EVIDENCE
Chapter 15
TENDER AND RECEIPT

Sec.

§ 9-1501. Written offer equivalent to tender.

An offer in writing to pay a particular sum of money, or to deliver a written instrument or specific personal property, is, if not accepted, equivalent to the actual production and tender of the money, instrument or property.

§ 9-1502. Debtor may demand receipt.

Whoever pays money, or delivers an instrument or property, is entitled to a receipt therefor from the person to whom the payment or delivery is made, and may demand a proper signature to such receipt as a condition of the payment or delivery.

Section Inapplicable to Creditor.

This statute gives the “debtor” the right to demand a receipt but it has no application to a creditor. Allis-Chalmers Mfg. Co. v. Harris, 56 Idaho 769, 59 P.2d 345 (1936).

A mortgage assignee’s offer to pay assignee of prior mortgage the amount paid by the latter therefor is held to be a legal tender, even if the offeror demanded an assignment instead of a release of prior mortgage, in the absence of objection to the mode, form, or substance of the offer. Allis-Chalmers Mfg. Co. v. Harris, 56 Idaho 769, 59 P.2d 345 (1936).